Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 8
LIQUIDATION, DISSOLUTION, AND REORGANIZATION

11-103-801. Voluntary liquidation and dissolution.

With the approval of the banking board, a state bank may liquidate and dissolve. The banking board shall grant such approval if it appears that the proposal to liquidate and dissolve has been approved by a vote of two-thirds of the outstanding voting stock at a meeting called for that purpose and that the capital of the state bank is adequate and such state bank has sufficient liquid assets to pay off depositors and creditors immediately.

Upon approval by the banking board, the bank shall forthwith cease to do business, shall have only the powers necessary to effect an orderly liquidation, and shall proceed to pay its depositors and creditors and to wind up its affairs.

Within thirty days after the approval, a notice of liquidation shall be sent by mail to each depositor, creditor, person interested in funds held as a fiduciary, lessee of a safe deposit box, and bailor of property at the address of such person as shown on the books of the bank. The notice shall be posted conspicuously on the premises of the bank and shall be given such publication as the banking board may require. The bank shall send with each notice a statement of the amount shown on the books to be the claim of the depositor or creditor. The notice shall demand that property held by the bank as bailee or in a safe deposit box be withdrawn by the person entitled thereto and that claims of depositors and creditors, if the amount claimed differs from that stated in the notice to be due, be filed with the bank before a specified date not earlier than sixty days thereafter, in accordance with the procedure prescribed in the notice.

As soon after approval as may be practicable, the state bank shall resign all fiduciary positions and take such action as may be necessary to settle its fiduciary accounts.

Safe deposit boxes, the contents of which have not been removed within thirty days after demand, shall be opened. Sealed packages containing the contents of such box, with a certificate of inventory of contents, together with any other unclaimed property held by the bank as bailee and certified inventories thereof shall be transferred to the banking board, which shall retain them for six years unless sooner claimed by the person entitled to them. After six years the banking board shall sell or otherwise appropriately dispose of the property. The proceeds of any sale shall be transferred to the state treasurer as abandoned funds.

The approval of an application for liquidation shall not impair any right of a depositor or creditor to payment in full, and all lawful claims of creditors and depositors shall promptly be paid. The unearned portion of the rental of a safe deposit box shall be returned to the lessee.

Any assets remaining after the discharge of all obligations shall be distributed to the stockholders in accordance with their respective interests. No such distribution shall be made before all claims of depositors and creditors have been paid or, in the case of any disputed claim, the bank has transmitted to the banking board a sum adequate to meet any liability that may be judicially determined and any funds payable to a depositor or creditor and unclaimed have been transmitted to the banking board.

Any unclaimed distribution to a stockholder or depositor shall be held until ninety days after the final distribution and then transmitted to the banking board. Such unclaimed funds shall be held by the banking board for six years and, unless sooner claimed by the person entitled thereto, shall be transferred to the treasury of the county in which the bank is located. The county treasurer and his successors shall hold such money in trust for a period of six years, unless the same shall be sooner paid out to the beneficial owner thereof or a suit is instituted to recover such money or a portion thereof. Any money remaining in said fund six years after the same is paid into the treasury of the county, for the recovery of which no action is pending, shall be transferred to the general fund of the county, and all rights of the former beneficial owners therein to recover the same shall be forever barred.

If the banking board finds that the assets will be insufficient for the full discharge of all obligations, or that completion of the liquidation has been unduly delayed, it may take possession and complete the liquidation in the manner provided in this code for involuntary liquidations.

The banking board may require reports of the progress of liquidation. If it is satisfied that the liquidation has been properly completed, it shall cancel the charter and enter an order of dissolution.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1099, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-5-101 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-802. Involuntary liquidation by banking board - reorganization.

Except as otherwise provided in this code, only the banking board may take possession of a state bank if, after a hearing before the banking board, the banking board finds: The bank's capital is inadequate or it is otherwise in an unsound condition; the bank's business is being conducted in an unlawful or unsound manner; the bank is unable to continue normal operations; examination of the bank has been obstructed or impeded; or control of the bank has been assumed by any person or persons convicted of fraud or a felony in this state or any other jurisdiction, or by any partnership, association, or corporation controlled, directly or indirectly, by any person so convicted, unless the banking board determines that such person has been duly rehabilitated or otherwise that the bank will be honestly and efficiently managed.

Notice of hearing shall be mailed by first class mail to the bank and the directors of the bank no less than ten days prior to the hearing. Any proceedings conducted pursuant to this subsection (1) shall be exempt from any provision of law requiring that proceedings of the banking board be conducted publicly.

The commissioner, upon order of the banking board, shall take possession by posting upon the premises a notice reciting that the commissioner is assuming possession pursuant to this code and the time, not earlier than the posting of the notice, when his or her possession shall be deemed to commence. A copy of the notice shall be filed in the district court in and for the county in which the bank is located. The commissioner shall notify the federal reserve bank of the district of taking possession of any state bank that is a member of the federal reserve system and shall notify the federal deposit insurance corporation of taking possession of any state bank that is a member of the federal deposit insurance corporation.

When the commissioner has taken possession of a state bank, the commissioner shall be vested with the full and exclusive power of management and control, including the power to continue or to discontinue the business; to stop or to limit the payment of its obligations; to employ any necessary assistants, including legal counsel; to execute any instrument in the name of the bank; to commence, defend, and conduct in its name any action or proceeding to which it may be a party; to terminate such possession by restoring the bank to its board of directors; and to reorganize or liquidate the bank in accordance with this code. As soon as practicable after taking possession, the commissioner shall make an inventory of the assets and file a copy thereof with the court in which the notice of possession was filed.

When the commissioner is in possession and while the commissioner's possession continues, there shall be a postponement, until six months after such taking, of the date upon which any period of limitation fixed by statute or agreement would otherwise expire on a claim or right of action of the bank, or upon which a review must be taken, or a pleading, or other document must be filed, by the bank in any pending action or proceeding.

If the banking board determines, after hearing before the banking board, to liquidate the state bank, it shall give notice of its determination by posting upon the premises a notice reciting that the determination has been made to liquidate the bank. A copy of the notice shall be filed in the district court in and for the county in which the bank is located. The commissioner, upon order of the banking board, shall tender to the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor the appointment as liquidator under section 11-103-805.

If, in the opinion of the banking board, an emergency exists that may result in serious losses to the depositors, it may take possession of a state bank and may immediately appoint the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor as liquidator in accordance with section 11-103-805 without notice of a hearing. Notice of the banking board's emergency determination shall be posted and filed in the same manner as prescribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3). Within ten days after the banking board's emergency determination, the bank or the directors of the bank may file an application with the banking board to rescind its determination. The filing of an application shall not act as a stay of the banking board's action pursuant to this subsection (3). The banking board shall grant the application if it finds that its action was unauthorized and shall rescind its action taking possession and restore the bank to its board of directors. If no application is filed within ten days after the banking board's emergency determination, all action taken by the banking board shall be final.

Notice of hearing shall be mailed by first class mail to the bank and the directors of the bank no less than ten days prior to the hearing. Any proceeding conducted pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be exempt from any provision of law requiring that proceedings of the banking board be conducted publicly.

If the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor does not accept the tender of appointment as liquidator, the banking board as liquidator shall proceed to liquidate the institution, upon first providing a bond executed by some surety company authorized to do business in this state, running to the people of the state of Colorado, that meets with the approval of the banking board, for the faithful discharge of its duties in connection with such liquidation and the accounting for all moneys coming into its hands. The cost of such bond shall be paid from the assets of the bank. Suit may be maintained on such bond by any person injured by a breach of conditions thereof.

If the commissioner determines to reorganize the state bank or if the banking board, after staying its liquidation, orders such reorganization, the commissioner, after according a hearing to all interested persons, shall enter an order proposing a reorganization plan. A copy of the plan shall be sent to each depositor and creditor who shall not receive payment of his or her claim in full under the plan, together with notice that, unless within fifteen days the plan is disapproved in writing by persons holding one-third or more of the aggregate amount of such claims, the commissioner will proceed to effect the reorganization. A department, agency, or political subdivision of this state holding a claim that will not be paid in full is authorized to participate as any other creditor.

No judgment, lien, or attachment shall be executed upon any asset of the state bank while it is in the possession of the banking board. Upon the election of the banking board, in connection with a liquidation or reorganization:

Any lien or attachment, other than an attorney's or mechanic's lien, obtained upon any asset of the state bank during the banking board's possession, or within four months prior to commencement thereof, shall be vacated and voided, except liens created by the banking board while in possession and further excepting liens or security interests obtained by the federal reserve bank;

Any transfer of an asset of the state bank made after or in contemplation of its insolvency, with intent to effect a preference, shall be voided.

With the approval of the banking board, the commissioner may borrow money in the name of the state bank and may pledge its assets as security for the loan.

All necessary and reasonable expenses of the commissioner's possession of a state bank and of its reorganization or liquidation shall be defrayed from the assets thereof.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1101, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-5-102 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-803. Reorganization plan.

A plan of reorganization shall not be prescribed under this code unless:

The plan is feasible and fair to all classes of depositors, creditors, and stockholders;

The aggregate face amount of the interest accorded to any class of depositors, creditors, or stockholders under the plan does not exceed the value of the assets upon liquidation, less the full amount of the claims of all prior classes, subject to any fair adjustment for new capital that any class will pay in under the plan;

The plan provides for the issuance of capital stock and, if necessary, debentures and other securities and instruments in an amount that will comply with the rules promulgated by the banking board;

Any exchange of new common stock for obligations or stock of the bank will be effected in inverse order to the priorities in liquidation of the classes that will retain an interest in the bank and upon terms that fairly adjust any change in the relative interests of the respective classes that will be produced by the exchange;

The plan assures the removal of any director, officer, or employee responsible for any unsound or unlawful action or the existence of an unsound condition;

Any merger or consolidation provided by the plan conforms to the requirements of this code.

If, in the course of reorganization, supervening conditions render the plan unfair or its execution impractical, the commissioner, upon approval of the banking board, may modify the plan or liquidate the institution. Any such action shall be taken by order of the banking board upon appropriate notice.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1103, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-5-103 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-804. Liquidation by commissioner - procedure.

In liquidating a state bank, the commissioner may exercise any power thereof, but the commissioner shall not, without the approval of the court in which notice of possession has been filed:

Sell any asset of the bank having a value in excess of five hundred dollars;

Compromise or release any claim if the amount of the claim exceeds five hundred dollars, exclusive of interest;

Make any payment on any claim, other than a claim upon an obligation incurred by the commissioner, before preparing and filing a schedule of the commissioner's determinations in accordance with this code.

Within six months after the commencement of liquidation, the commissioner may, by his or her election, terminate any executory contract for services or advertising to which the state bank is a party, or any obligation of the bank as a lessee. A lessor who receives at least sixty days' notice of the commissioner's election to terminate the lease shall have no claim for rent, other than rent accrued to the date of termination, nor for damages for such termination.

As soon after the commencement of liquidation as is practicable, the commissioner shall take the necessary steps to terminate all fiduciary positions held by the state bank and take such action as may be necessary to surrender all property held by the bank as a fiduciary and to settle its fiduciary accounts.

The right of any agency of the United States insuring deposits to be subrogated to the rights of depositors upon payment of their claims shall not be less extensive than the law of the United States requires as a condition of the authority to issue such insurance or make such payments to depositors of national banks.

As soon after the commencement of liquidation as is practicable, the commissioner shall send notice of the liquidation to each known depositor, creditor, and lessee of a safe deposit box and bailor of property held by the bank at the address shown on the books of the institution. The notice shall also be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the institution is located once a week for three successive weeks. The commissioner shall send with each notice a statement of the amount shown on the books of the institution to be the claim of the depositor or creditor. The notice shall demand that property held by the bank as bailee, or in a safe deposit box, be withdrawn by the person entitled thereto and the claim of a depositor or creditor, if the amount claimed differs from that stated in the notice to be due, be filed with the commissioner before a specified date, not earlier than sixty days thereafter, in accordance with the procedure prescribed in the notice.

Safe deposit boxes, the contents of which have not been removed before the date specified, shall be opened by the commissioner. Sealed packages containing the contents of such box, with a certificate of inventory of contents, together with any unclaimed property held by the bank as bailee and certified inventories thereof, shall be held by the commissioner for six years unless sooner claimed by the person entitled thereto. After six years the commissioner may sell or otherwise appropriately dispose of the property. The proceeds of a sale shall be transferred and disposed of in accordance with the provisions of subsection (11) of this section.

Within six months after the last day specified in the notice for the filing of claims, or within such longer period as may be allowed by the court in which notice of possession has been filed, the commissioner shall:

Reject any claim if he or she doubts the validity thereof;

Determine the amount, if any, owing to each known creditor or depositor and the priority class of such claim under this code;

Prepare a schedule of the commissioner's determinations for filing in the court in which notice of possession was filed;

Notify each person whose claim has not been allowed in full and publish once a week for three successive weeks, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the institution is located, a notice of the time when and the place where the schedule of determinations will be available for inspection and the date, not sooner than thirty days thereafter, when the commissioner will file the schedule in court.

Within twenty days after the filing of the commissioner's schedule, any creditor, depositor, or stockholder may file an objection to any determination made that adversely affects such objector. Any objections so filed shall be heard and determined by the court upon such notice to the commissioner and interested claimants as the court may prescribe. If the objection is sustained, the court shall direct an appropriate modification of the schedule. After filing the schedule, the commissioner may, from time to time, make partial distribution to the holders of claims that are undisputed or have been allowed by the court if a proper reserve is established for the payment of disputed claims. As soon as is practicable after the determination of all objections, the commissioner shall make final distribution.

On liquidation of a state bank, after payment of federal deposit insurance, claims for payment have the following priority:

Obligations incurred by the commissioner, fees and assessments due to the division, and expenses of liquidation, all of which may be covered by a proper reserve of funds;

Claims of depositors having an approved claim against the general liquidating account of the bank;

Claims of general creditors having an approved claim against the general liquidating account of the bank;

Claims otherwise proper that were not filed within the time prescribed by this code;

Approved claims of subordinate creditors; and

Claims of stockholders of the bank.

On liquidation of a state bank, after payment of federal deposit insurance, claims by governmental units for payment of uninsured deposits collateralized pursuant to the "Public Deposit Protection Act of 1975", article 10.5 of this title, shall be governed by the provisions of said article. Claims by governmental units for payment of uninsured deposits not collateralized pursuant to article 10.5 of this title shall have the same priority assigned to depositors under subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (9).

Any assets remaining after all claims have been paid shall be distributed to the stockholders in accordance with their respective interests.

Unclaimed funds remaining after completion of the liquidation shall be retained for six years by the commissioner unless sooner claimed by the owner. At the expiration of such period, the remaining sum shall be transferred to the treasury of the county in which the bank is located. The county treasurer and his or her successors shall hold such money in trust for a period of six years, unless the same is sooner paid out to the beneficial owner or owners thereof, or a suit is instituted to recover such money or a portion thereof. Any money remaining in said fund six years after the same is paid into the treasury of the county, for the recovery of which no action is pending, shall be transferred to the general fund of the county, and all rights of the former beneficial owners therein to recover the same shall be forever barred.

When the assets have been distributed in accordance with this code, the commissioner shall file an account with the court. Upon approval thereof, the commissioner shall be relieved of liability in connection with the liquidation, and shall cancel the charter.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1104, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-5-104 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-805. Federal deposit insurance corporation or successor as liquidator.

The federal deposit insurance corporation, created by section 12B of the "Federal Reserve Act", as amended, or its successor is authorized to act without bond as liquidator of any banking institution, the deposits in which are to any extent insured by said corporation or its successor pursuant to section 11-103-802.

Pursuant to section 11-103-802, the commissioner, upon order of the banking board, shall tender to said corporation or its successor the appointment as liquidator of such banking institution.

After being notified in writing of the acceptance of such an appointment, the commissioner shall file in the office of the clerk and recorder in the county in which the bank is situated a certificate evidencing the appointment of the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor. Upon such an appointment, the possession of all the assets, business, and property of such bank of every kind and nature, wheresoever situated, shall be deemed transferred from such bank and the banking board to the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor. Without the execution of any instruments of conveyance, assignment, transfer, or endorsement, the title to all such assets and property shall be vested in the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor, and the banking board and the commissioner shall be forever thereafter relieved from all responsibility and liability in respect to the liquidation of such bank; except that the banking board may retain jurisdiction over and responsibility for liquidation of eligible collateral pledged pursuant to the "Public Deposit Protection Act", article 10.5 of this title, to secure public deposits not insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor.

If the corporation or its successor accepts said appointment, it has all the powers and privileges provided by the laws of this state with respect to the liquidation of a banking institution, its depositors, and other creditors.

When a state bank is liquidated, after payment of federal deposit insurance, claims for payment shall have the following priority:

Obligations incurred by the banking board, fees and assessments due to the division of banking, and expenses of liquidation, all of which may be covered by a proper reserve of funds;

Claims of depositors having an approved claim against the general liquidating account of the bank;

Claims of general creditors having an approved claim against the general liquidating account of the bank;

Claims otherwise proper that were not filed within the time prescribed by this code;

Approved claims of subordinate creditors; and

Claims of stockholders of the bank.

When a state bank is liquidated, after payment of federal deposit insurance, claims of official custodians of public funds for payment of uninsured public funds pursuant to the "Public Deposit Protection Act", article 10.5 of this title, shall be governed by the provisions of this subsection (5). In the event that the state bank holds collateral that is pledged for the safekeeping and protection of uninsured public funds on deposit pursuant to article 10.5 of this title, such collateral shall be considered to be held in trust on behalf of the official custodian, and the liquidator shall not use such collateral to pay any claim or liability other than that of the official custodian until all claims for uninsured public funds have been paid. In the event that such collateral is insufficient to pay all claims made by official custodians, the payment of such claims shall be made according to a pro rata formula. Claims by official custodians for payment of uninsured deposits not collateralized pursuant to article 10.5 of this title shall have the same priority as that assigned to depositors under subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (5).

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1106, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-5-105 as it existed prior to 2003.

Cross references:

For the "Federal Reserve Act", see 12 U.S.C. § 221 et seq.

11-103-806. Assets sold or pledged as security.

With respect to any banking institution closed on account of inability to meet the demands of its depositors or by action of the banking board or by action of its directors or in the event of its capital inadequacy or suspension, the liquidator of such institution may borrow from the federal deposit insurance corporation and furnish any part or all of the assets of said institution to said corporation as security for a loan from same, but, if said corporation is acting as such liquidator, the order of a court of record of competent jurisdiction shall be first obtained approving such loan. Upon the order of a court of record of competent jurisdiction, all or any part of the assets of such institution may be sold.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit the power of any banking institution, the commissioner, or the liquidators to pledge or sell assets in accordance with any existing law.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1107, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-5-106 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-807. Enforcement of directors' liability.

Among its other powers, the federal deposit insurance corporation, in the performance of its powers and duties as such liquidator, has the right and power, upon the order of a court of record of competent jurisdiction, to enforce the individual liability of the directors of any such banking institution.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1108, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-5-107 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-808. Emergency grant of new charter.

In addition to powers regarding liquidation or reorganization, the banking board may, in the interest of protecting the public and the depositors of a closed state bank or national banking association with its principal office in this state, issue a new bank charter to qualified individuals for the same location as the closed bank, contingent upon the new bank assuming full liability for such deposits of the closed bank as may be transferred to it. Under such conditions, a new charter may be issued summarily without the publication of notice, without the holding of a public hearing, and without complying with any of the other provisions and procedures specified in this code.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1108, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-5-108 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-809. Emergency grant of branch facility - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that the economy of this state and its communities and the public interest will be better served by permitting financial institutions, as defined in section 11-101-401 (35), to operate at the same location as a closed bank.

In addition to powers regarding liquidation or reorganization, the banking board, in the interest of protecting the public and the depositors of a closed bank or national banking association with its principal place of business in this state, may issue an emergency grant of authority to another financial institution, which financial institution has acquired assets and liabilities of the closed bank, to operate a branch facility at the same location as the closed bank, or within a one-half mile radius of the location of the nearest point on the boundary of the premises of the closed bank's place of business, contingent upon the bank assuming full liability for the deposits of the closed bank as may be transferred to it. Such branch facility shall not be located at any other location if the other location is within three hundred feet of the boundary of the premises of another bank unless the other bank consents to a closer location.

Under such conditions, the authority to operate the branch facility may be issued summarily without the publication of notice, without the holding of a public hearing, and without complying with any of the other provisions and procedures specified in this code.

No financial institution may hold, acquire, control, or operate more than two branch facilities pursuant to this section; however, if the banking board determines that, because of this limitation, no qualified financial institution can bid on the assets and liabilities of the closed bank, the banking board may authorize and issue such an emergency grant to another financial institution, in excess of such limit, but in no event more than two additional branch facilities.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a branch facility operated pursuant to this section on or before August 1, 1991, may continue to operate in perpetuity as a branch without being subject to any percentage limitation on branches as set forth in section 11-105-602.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1108, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1466, § 14, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-5-109 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-810. Preapproved shelf charter.

The board may preapprove a shelf charter for a new bank to qualified individuals, contingent upon the new bank completing all specified requirements and purchasing the assets and assuming the liabilities of a bank in receivership as the federal deposit insurance corporation may determine, if the proposed bank has its principal place of business in Colorado and has assets and liabilities held in receivership by the federal deposit insurance corporation. The shelf charter may be preapproved and summarily issued without publication of a notice, without the holding of a public hearing, and without complying with all of the other provisions and procedures specified in this code. Upon federal deposit insurance corporation approval of the purchase and assumption by the new bank, the final charter approval may be granted, together with final approval of deposit insurance by the federal deposit insurance corporation. If the bid is not accepted by the federal deposit insurance corporation, the charter remains on the shelf for up to eighteen months. During that time, the charter may be used for other bids.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1053), ch. 159, p. 688, § 4, effective August 5.